Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2667.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 37, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3958, to read: START_STATUTE41-3958. Homebuyer assistance; programs; requirements; prohibition A. Any first-time homebuyer program or downpayment assistance program that is offered by this state or an agency in this state must meet all of the following requirements: 1. The recipient must be a resident of this state for at least two years before applying to a program. 2. The home must be occupied by the recipient for at least two years as the recipient's primary residence. 3. The home may not be used as a vacation rental or short-term rental as defined in section 9-500.39 or 11-269.17 until all program monies are repaid by the recipient. B. An out-of-state investor is not eligible for any first-time homebuyer program or downpayment assistance program that is offered by this state or an agency in this state. END_STATUTE